District of Columbia statutes.
32-608

Mayor’s recommendations on review of final report.

The Mayor shall review the conclusions and recommendations of the final report and, within a period not to exceed 60 days, shall transmit to the Council his conclusions accompanied by any recommendations, modifications, and reasons thereof. The Council shall consider this transmittal and shall, within a period not to exceed 180 days, develop legislation, if necessary, to implement all or parts of the Commission’s final report and the Mayor’s recommendations.

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-162, § 9, 33 DCR 6684
1981 Ed., § 36-1108.